Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Commonwealth Venture Fund

154.20-300.
Short title for KRS 154.20-300 to 154.20-390. [Repealed.]

154.20-305.
Purposes of KRS 154.20-300 to 154.20-390. [Repealed.]

154.20-310.
Definitions for KRS 154.20-300 to 154.20-390. [Repealed.]

154.20-320.
Establishment and operation of fund. [Repealed.]

154.20-330.
Investment by entity not subject to taxes listed in KRS 154.20-310 and 154.20-360. [Repealed.]

154.20-340.
Investment tax credits — Years — Carryovers. [Repealed.]

154.20-350.
Maximum credits. [Repealed.]

154.20-360.
Application of tax credit. [Repealed.]

154.20-370.
Procedure to receive tax credit. [Repealed.]

154.20-380.
Loss of credit through early redemption. [Repealed.]

154.20-390.
Reporting requirements. [Repealed.]